Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 9. SAFETY

SUBTITLE A. PUBLIC SAFETY

CHAPTER 766. FIRE SAFETY IN RESIDENTIAL DWELLINGS

SUBCHAPTER A. SMOKE DETECTORS AND FIRE SAFETY INFORMATION

Sec. 766.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Carbon monoxide alarm" means a device that detects and sounds an alarm to indicate the presence of a harmful level of carbon monoxide gas.

(2) "Department" means the Texas Department of Insurance.

(3) "Fossil fuel" includes coal, kerosene, oil, wood, fuel gases, and other petroleum or hydrocarbon products.

(4) "One-family or two-family dwelling" means a structure that has one or two residential units that are occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by individuals.

(5) "Smoke detector" means a device or a listed component of a system that detects and sounds an alarm to indicate the presence of visible or invisible products of combustion in the air.

(6) "Smoke detector for hearing-impaired persons" has the meaning assigned by Section 792.001.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 (H.B. 2118), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 766.002. SMOKE DETECTOR REQUIREMENT. (a) Each one-family or two-family dwelling constructed in this state must have working smoke detectors installed in the dwelling in accordance with the smoke detector requirements of the building code in effect in the political subdivision in which the dwelling is located, including performance, location, and power source requirements.

(b) If a one-family or two-family dwelling does not comply with the smoke detector requirements of the building code in effect in the political subdivision in which the dwelling is located, any home improvement to the dwelling that requires the issuance of a building permit must include the installation of smoke detectors in accordance with the building code in effect in the political subdivision in which the dwelling is located, including performance, location, and power source requirements.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 (H.B. 2118), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 766.0021. SMOKE DETECTOR FOR HEARING-IMPAIRED PERSONS. (a) A purchaser under a written contract for the sale of a one-family or two-family dwelling may require the seller to install smoke detectors for hearing-impaired persons if:

(1) the purchaser or a member of the purchaser's family who will reside in the dwelling is a hearing-impaired person;

(2) the purchaser provides written evidence of the hearing impairment signed by a licensed physician; and

(3) not later than the 10th day after the effective date of the contract, the purchaser requests in writing that the seller install smoke detectors for hearing-impaired persons and specifies the locations in the dwelling where the smoke detectors are to be installed.

(b) If the seller is required to install smoke detectors for hearing-impaired persons under Subsection (a), the seller and purchaser may agree:

(1) which party will bear the cost of installing the smoke detectors; and

(2) which brand of smoke detectors to install.

(c) The seller must install the smoke detectors not later than the closing date of the sale of the dwelling.

(d) A purchaser may terminate the contract to purchase the dwelling if the seller fails to install smoke detectors for hearing-impaired persons as required by this section.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 (H.B. 2118), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 766.0025. FRATERNITY AND SORORITY HOUSES. (a) In this section, "fraternity or sorority house" means a dwelling that:

(1) is a separate structure and that is not a multiunit residential property composed of multiple independent residential units; and

(2) serves as living quarters for members of a fraternity or sorority.

(b) The owner of a fraternity or sorority house must have working smoke detectors installed in the fraternity house or sorority house in accordance with the smoke detector requirements of the building code in effect in the political subdivision in which the fraternity or sorority house is located, including performance, location, and power source requirements.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 (H.B. 2118), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 766.003. INFORMATION RELATING TO FIRE SAFETY AND CARBON MONOXIDE DANGERS. (a) The department shall prepare information of public interest relating to:

(1) fire safety in the home; and

(2) the dangers of carbon monoxide.

(b) The information must inform the public about:

(1) ways to prevent fires in the home, and actions to take if a fire occurs in the home;

(2) the need to test smoke detectors every month to ensure the smoke detector is working;

(3) replacing the battery in a battery-operated smoke detector every six months;

(4) the need to have fire safety equipment in the home, including fire extinguishers and emergency escape ladders;

(5) the need to develop and practice a fire escape plan;

(6) the availability of carbon monoxide detectors;

(7) using carbon monoxide alarms as a backup to prevent carbon monoxide poisoning; and

(8) the need to properly use and maintain fossil fuel-burning appliances.

(c) The department shall distribute the information described by this section to the public in any manner the department determines is cost-effective, including providing the information on the department's Internet website and publishing informational pamphlets.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 (H.B. 2118), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER B. FIRE PROTECTION SPRINKLER SYSTEMS IN CERTAIN RESIDENTIAL HIGH-RISE BUILDINGS IN CERTAIN COUNTIES

Sec. 766.051. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Fire protection sprinkler system" means an assembly of underground or overhead piping or conduits that conveys water with or without other agents to dispersal openings or devices to:

(A) extinguish, control, or contain fire; and

(B) provide protection from exposure to fire or the products of combustion.

(2) "Residential high-rise building" means a building used primarily for a residential purpose and that extends 75 feet or more from the ground.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 871 (H.B. 3089), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 766.052. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to a residential high-rise building:

(1) that is located in a county with a population of more than 1.5 million in which more than 70 percent of the population resides in a single municipality;

(2) in which at least 50 percent of the residents are elderly individuals, individuals with a disability, or individuals with a mobility impairment; and

(3) that is not designated as a historically or archaeologically significant site by the Texas Historical Commission or the governing body of the county or municipality in which the building is located.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 871 (H.B. 3089), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 102, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 766.053. FIRE PROTECTION SPRINKLER SYSTEMS REQUIRED; STANDARD. (a) A residential high-rise building must be equipped with a complete fire protection sprinkler system that is in good working order and is in compliance with this section.

(b) The governing body of a municipality in which a residential high-rise building subject to this subchapter is located or, if the building is not located in a municipality, the commissioners court of the county in which the building is located shall adopt a standard for the installation of fire protection sprinkler systems in a residential high-rise building.

(c) The standard adopted must be in compliance with National Fire Protection Association 13: Standard for the Installation of Sprinkler Systems. Until the governing body of the municipality or commissioners court of the county, as applicable, adopts a standard as required by this section, the standard is the Standard for the Installation of Sprinkler Systems of the National Fire Protection Association, as that standard existed on September 1, 2015.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 871 (H.B. 3089), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

For expiration of this section, see Subsection (i).

Sec. 766.054. PHASE-IN COMPLIANCE FOR OWNERS OF CERTAIN RESIDENTIAL HIGH-RISE BUILDINGS. (a) This section applies only to an owner of a residential high-rise building built before September 1, 2015.

(b) Not later than September 1, 2018, an owner of a residential high-rise building shall provide notice of the owner's intent to comply with this subchapter to:

(1) if the building is located in a municipality, the appropriate code official of the municipality in which the building is located; or

(2) if the building is not located in a municipality, the county clerk of the county in which the building is located.

(c) Not later than September 1, 2021, the owner of a residential high-rise building shall install a water supply on all floors of the building in accordance with National Fire Protection Association 13: Standard for the Installation of Sprinkler Systems.

(d) Not later than September 1, 2024, the owner of a residential high-rise building shall install a fire protection sprinkler system in accordance with this subchapter on at least 50 percent of the floors of the building.

(e) Not later than September 1, 2027, the owner of a residential high-rise building shall install a fire protection sprinkler system in accordance with this subchapter on all floors of the building.

(f) Notwithstanding Subsections (b), (c), (d), and (e), an owner of multiple residential high-rise buildings built before September 1, 2015, is considered to have met the requirements of this section if a fire protection sprinkler system is installed on all floors of:

(1) at least 33 percent of the owner's residential high-rise buildings not later than September 1, 2021;

(2) at least 66 percent of the owner's residential high-rise buildings not later than September 1, 2024; and

(3) all of the owner's residential high-rise buildings not later than September 1, 2027.

(g) If a residential high-rise building is a condominium as defined by Section 81.002 or 82.003, Property Code, the apartment or unit owners of the condominium may comply with this subchapter by acting jointly through the council of owners or unit owners' association, as applicable, of the condominium.

(h) For purposes of Sections 766.055 and 766.056, a residential high-rise building is in compliance with this subchapter if the owner of the building has met the requirements of this section.

(i) This section expires September 1, 2028.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 871 (H.B. 3089), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 766.055. INJUNCTION. (a) The attorney general, the county attorney of a county in which a residential high-rise building is located, or the district attorney of a county in which the building is located may bring an action in the name of the state for an injunction to enforce this subchapter against the owner or person in charge of a residential high-rise building not in compliance with this subchapter.

(b) The action must be brought in the district court of the county in which the residential high-rise building is located.

(c) The attorney general, county attorney of the county in which the residential high-rise building is located, or district attorney of the county in which the building is located, as applicable, shall give the owner or person in charge of the building notice of the time and place of a hearing for an action brought under this section not later than the 10th day before the date of the hearing.

(d) A district judge may issue a mandatory injunction against the owner or person in charge of a residential high-rise building not in compliance with this subchapter to enforce this subchapter. Violation of an injunction issued under this section constitutes contempt of court and is punishable in the manner provided for contempt.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 871 (H.B. 3089), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 766.056. CRIMINAL PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person is the owner of a residential high-rise building that is not in compliance with this subchapter.

(b) A person commits an offense if the person serves as an agent for an owner who is not a resident of this state in the care, management, supervision, control, or rental of a residential high-rise building not in compliance with this subchapter.

(c) An offense under this section is punishable by a fine of not more than $10,000.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 871 (H.B. 3089), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.